District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-706

Trustees or directors — Effect of failure to elect.

Repealed.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1282, ch. 854, § 592
June 26, 1922, 42 Stat. 665, ch. 241
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(k)(6), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-706.
1981 Ed., § 29-906.
1973 Ed., § 29-506.